apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="lul/e__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esh</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="njer/i__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iut</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iut</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iun</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëzve</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëzve</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëzit</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëz</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëzve</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëzve</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëzit</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëz</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vajz/ë__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ash</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ën</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vajzë"><i>vajz</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="njeri"><i>njer</i><par n="njer/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="agnushe"><i>agnush</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aleate"><i>aleat</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="analogjike"><i>analogjik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="anëse"><i>anës</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="arktike"><i>arktik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="athinase"><i>athinas</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="baritore"><i>baritor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bishtajore"><i>bishtajor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="burokratike"><i>burokratik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dallavere"><i>dallaver</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dhelparake"><i>dhelparak</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="djallëzore"><i>djallëzor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dyrrotëshe"><i>dyrrotësh</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ekzocentrike"><i>ekzocentrik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="etnokulturore"><i>etnokulturor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="finale"><i>final</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fryzëkuqe"><i>fryzëkuq</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gjashtërrokëshe"><i>gjashtërrokësh</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gojore"><i>gojor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="hatashme"><i>hatashm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="identike"><i>identik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="internacionale"><i>internacional</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="joligjore"><i>joligjor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kanike"><i>kanik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="klasike"><i>klasik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="konstituive"><i>konstituiv</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kreshnike"><i>kreshnik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kuruese"><i>kurues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="legjitime"><i>legjitim</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="luleshtrydhe"><i>luleshtrydh</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="masive"><i>masiv</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="metodike"><i>metodik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="molekulare"><i>molekular</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mësymëse"><i>mësymës</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nemte"><i>nemt</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="njëshme"><i>njëshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ofenduese"><i>ofendues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="padëshirueshme"><i>padëshirueshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paluhatshme"><i>paluhatshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paqeruajtëse"><i>paqeruajtës</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="parrezikshme"><i>parrezikshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pavullnetshme"><i>pavullnetshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjekëse"><i>pjekës</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="premtuese"><i>premtues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="publikuese"><i>publikues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="përkujtuese"><i>përkujtues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qelizore"><i>qelizor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reformuese"><i>reformues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ripërtërishme"><i>ripërtërishm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sabotuese"><i>sabotues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shishe"><i>shish</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shtatëditore"><i>shtatëditor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sintetizuese"><i>sintetizues</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stacionare"><i>stacionar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tanipërtanishme"><i>tanipërtanishm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="thrumbe"><i>thrumb</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trevjeçare"><i>trevjeçar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="urrejtshme"><i>urrejtshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vetme"><i>vetm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xhave"><i>xhav</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zoologjike"><i>zoologjik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="biletë"><i>bilet</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="financë"><i>financ</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="grevë"><i>grev</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="patrullë"><i>patrull</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pistoletë"><i>pistolet</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="raketë"><i>raket</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sfidë"><i>sfid</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trazirë"><i>trazir</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="udhëshpejtë"><i>udhëshpejt</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vonesë"><i>vones</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ekspozitë"><i>ekspozit</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kështjellë"><i>kështjell</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="molekulë"><i>molekul</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pllakë"><i>pllak</i><par n="vajz/ë__n_f"/></e>
